Washington statutes.
RCW 19.290.090

Exemptions from chapter.

The provisions of this chapter do not apply to transactions involving metal from the components of vehicles acquired by vehicle wreckers, hulk haulers, or scrap processors licensed under chapter 46.79 or 46.80 RCW, and acquired in accordance with those laws or transactions conducted by the following:

(1) Motor vehicle dealers licensed under chapter 46.70 RCW;

(2) Persons in the business of operating an automotive repair facility as defined under RCW 46.71.011; and

(3) Persons in the business of buying or selling empty food and beverage containers, including metal food and beverage containers.

[ 2013 c 322 s 11; 2008 c 233 s 8; 2007 c 377 s 9.]